Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2348.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriations; department of emergency and military affairs; exemption; intent A. The sum of $__________ is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of emergency and military affairs to provide wireless networking technology for reserve service members and units at department training centers. B. The sum of $__________ is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of emergency and military affairs to establish a program to reimburse service members who are not assigned government computers and who must use personal computers for department purposes. C. The sum of $__________ is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of emergency and military affairs to establish a lodging-in-kind program for service members who attend drills other than field exercises at a training center that is at least fifty miles from the service member's home and that does not provide barracks facilities. D. The sum of $__________ is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of emergency and military affairs to upgrade deficient HVAC units and perform ongoing maintenance at training centers. E. The appropriations made in subsections A, B, C and D of this section are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations. F. The legislature intends that the appropriation made in subsection A of this section be considered ongoing funding in future years. Sec. 2. Short title This act may be cited as the "Arizona National Guard Service Member Morale and Readiness Act".